Louisiana, session 2026, HB1152.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1110(A)(2), (B)(1), (C)(introductory paragraph) and (1)(d) and
(f) through (h), (D), and (H) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 30:1103(10) and
1110(J) and (K) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1103. Definitions
Unless the context otherwise requires, the words defined in this Section have
the following meaning when found in this Chapter:
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
* * *
(10) "Fee" means a regulatory charge, assessment, or cost authorized by this
Chapter, including but not limited to the fees levied pursuant to R.S. 30:1110(C).
For purposes of R.S. 30:1110(C)(1), the term "fee" includes:
(a) "Trust fund fee", meaning the portion of the fee required to be deposited
into the Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage Trust Fund.
(b) "Excess fee", meaning the portion of the fee collected pursuant to R.S.
30:1110(C)(1) that is collected after the trust fund fee has been suspended for a
storage facility or storage operator pursuant to R.S. 30:1110(C)(1)(f) or (g), or
otherwise exceeds the amount required to be credited to the Carbon Dioxide
Geologic Storage Trust Fund pursuant to R.S. 30:1110(C)(1)(h), and that is required
to be deposited into the account established in R.S. 30:1110(J).
* * *
§1110. Carbon Dioxide Geologic Storage Trust Fund
A.
* * *
(2) After compliance with the requirements of Article VII, Section 9(B) of
the Constitution of Louisiana relative to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund,
and after a sufficient amount is allocated from that fund to pay all of the obligations
secured by the full faith and credit of the state which become due and payable within
any fiscal year, the treasurer shall pay into the fund, an amount equal to the monies
received by the state treasury pursuant to this Chapter, except any excess fees as
defined in R.S. 30:1103 shall be deposited into the account established in Subsection
J of this Section. The monies in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this
Section and only in the amount appropriated by the legislature. All unexpended and
unencumbered monies remaining in this fund at the end of the fiscal year shall
remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer
in the same manner as monies in the state general fund and all returns of such
investment shall be deposited to the fund. At the request of the Natural Resources
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
Trust Authority, the state treasurer may invest monies in the fund, or any portion
thereof, in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 33:2955, including the use of the
Louisiana Asset Management Pool, and any interest earned on such investments shall
be credited to the fund. The funds received shall be placed in the special trust fund
in the custody of the state treasurer to be used only in accordance with this Chapter
and shall not be placed in the general fund. The funds provided to the secretary
pursuant to this Section shall at all times be and remain the property of the secretary.
The funds shall be used only for the purposes set forth in this Chapter and for no
other governmental purposes, nor shall any branch of government be allowed to
borrow any portion of the funds. It is the intent of the legislature that this fund and
its increments shall remain intact and inviolate.
B. The following monies shall be placed into the fund:
(1) The fees, penalties, and bond forfeitures collected pursuant to this
Chapter, except excess fees deposited pursuant to Subsection J of this Section. All
fees and self-generated revenue remaining on deposit for the department at the end
of any fiscal year shall be deposited into the fund.
* * *
C. The secretary is hereby authorized to levy on each storage facility the
following fees or costs for the purpose of funding the fund and the account
established in Subsection J of this Section:
(1) A fee payable to the department, in a form and schedule prescribed by
the department, for each ton of carbon dioxide injected for storage into that storage
facility. This fee is to be determined based upon the following formula:
* * *
(d) "M" is the maximum payment of five million dollars and is the total
amount of fees to be collected before the payment of the fee can be suspended as
provided in this Section. trust fund fees required to be deposited into the fund for a
storage facility before the trust fund fee may be suspended as provided in this
Section. Any fee amounts collected pursuant to this Paragraph during any period in
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
which the trust fund fee is suspended shall be deposited as an excess fee into the
account established in Subsection J of this Section.
* * *
(f) Once five million dollars has been contributed to the fund for a storage
facility, the fee assessments to that storage facility under this Section shall cease
until such time as funds begin to be expended for that storage facility. The secretary
of the Department of Conservation and Energy shall certify to the secretary the date
on which the balance in the fund for a storage facility equals or exceeds five million
dollars. The fund fees shall not be collected or required to be paid on or after the
first day of the second month following the certification, except that the secretary
shall resume collecting the fees on receipt of a certification from the secretary of the
Department of Conservation and Energy the trust fund fee attributable to that storage
facility under this Section shall be suspended for deposit into the fund until such time
as funds begin to be expended for that storage facility. The undersecretary of the
department shall certify to the secretary the date on which the balance in the fund for
a storage facility equals or exceeds five million dollars. Beginning on the first day
of the second month following the certification, the trust fund fee shall not be
deposited into the fund; however, the fee shall continue to be required and collected
and any fee amounts collected pursuant to this Paragraph during any period in which
the trust fund fee is suspended shall be deposited as an excess fee into the account
established in Subsection J of this Section. The secretary shall resume depositing the
trust fund fee into the fund upon receipt of a certification from the undersecretary
that, based on the expenditures or commitments to expend monies, the fund has
fallen below four million dollars for that storage facility.
(g) Notwithstanding the total number of storage facilities owned or operated
by a storage operator, once ten million dollars has been contributed to the fund by
a storage operator, the fee assessment to that storage operator under this Section shall
cease until such time as funds begin to be expended for any storage facility owned
or operated by that storage operator. The secretary of the Department of
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
Conservation and Energy shall certify to the secretary the date on which the balance
in the fund for a storage operator equals or exceeds ten million dollars. The fund
fees shall not be collected or required to be paid on or after the first day of the second
month following the certification, except that the secretary shall resume collecting
the fees upon receipt of a certification from the secretary of the Department of
Conservation and Energy that, based on the expenditures or commitments to expend
monies, the fund has fallen below eight million dollars for that storage operator. The
undersecretary of the department shall certify to the secretary the date on which the
balance in the fund for a storage operator equals or exceeds ten million dollars.
Beginning on the first day of the second month following the certification, the trust
fund fee shall not be deposited into the fund; however, the fee shall continue to be
collected and required to be paid, and any fee amounts collected pursuant to this
Paragraph during any period in which the trust fund fee is suspended shall be
deposited as an excess fee into the account established in Subsection J of this
Section. The secretary shall resume depositing the trust fund fee into the fund upon
receipt of a certification from the undersecretary of the department that, based on the
expenditures or commitments to expend monies, the fund has fallen below eight
million dollars for that storage operator.
(h) At the end of each fiscal year, the fee may be redetermined by the
secretary based upon the estimated cost of administering and enforcing this Chapter
for the upcoming year divided by the tonnage of carbon dioxide expected to be
injected during the upcoming year. The total fee assessed shall be sufficient to
assure a balance in the fund not to exceed five million dollars for any active storage
facility within the state at the beginning of each fiscal year. Any amount received
that exceeds the annual balance required shall be deposited in the fund, but
appropriate credits shall be given against future fees or fees associated with other
storage facilities operated by the same storage operator. Any amount received under
this Paragraph that exceeds the amount required to be credited to the fund shall be
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
deposited as an excess fee into the account established in Subsection J of this
Section.
* * *
D. The provisions of the Louisiana Tax Code shall apply to the
administration, collection, and enforcement of the fees imposed herein, and the
penalties provided by that code shall apply to any person who fails to pay or report
the fees. Proceeds from the fees, including any penalties and interest collected in
connection with the fees, shall be deposited into the fund, or, when applicable, into
the account established in Subsection J of this Section.
* * *
H. The secretary shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements related to the administration of the fund and site-specific trust funds
and shall make a specific annual report addressing the administration of the funds to
the Senate Committee on Natural Resources, the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment, and the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality
before March first. The report shall also include, at a minimum, a summary of
deposits into and disbursements from the account established in Subsection J of this
Section, including recipients, amounts, and general categories of expenditures.
* * *
J. There is hereby established within the Department of Conservation and
Energy a Carbon Dioxide Community Safety and Protection program, to be
administered by the Natural Resources Trust Authority. The trust authority is
authorized to allocate funds for the program in accordance with the specific
eligibility criteria and limitations outlined in this Section.
(1) There is hereby established in the state treasury, in the custody of the
state treasurer, a special account to be known as the Carbon Dioxide Community
Protection Account, hereinafter referred to as the "account". The account shall
constitute a special custodial trust account and shall be administered by the Natural
Resources Trust Authority, in coordination with the secretary. Monies in the account
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
shall be used solely as provided in this Subsection and only in the amount
appropriated by the legislature. Unexpended and unencumbered monies remaining
in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall remain in the account. The monies
in the account shall not be placed in the state general fund.
(2) The account shall consist of:
(a) Excess fees deposited pursuant to Paragraph (A)(2) and Subparagraphs
(C)(1)(f), (g), and (h) of this Section.
(b) Interest or investment earnings credited to the account.
(c) Grants, donations, and private contributions designated for the purposes
of this Subsection.
(3) There is hereby created within the account a subaccount to be known as
the Local Public Safety and Emergency Preparedness Subaccount. Not less than
thirty percent of all excess fees deposited into the account each fiscal year shall be
credited to the subaccount.
(4) Monies in the account and subaccount shall be used solely for public
safety and emergency preparedness activities directly related to carbon dioxide
geologic storage and the associated risks regulated under this Chapter, including but
not limited to:
(a) Emergency response planning, training, and exercises for fire, law
enforcement, emergency medical services, emergency management, emergency
response communications, and 911 personnel.
(b) Equipment, facilities, and interoperable communications used for
incident response, evacuation coordination, plume or air monitoring, public
notification, alerts, and incident command.
(c) Mutual aid coordination, emergency operations planning, and public
information and education specific to carbon dioxide geologic storage operations.
(d) Reimbursement to local governmental entities for reasonable and
necessary public safety costs incurred in responding to, preparing for, or recovering
from an incident or emergency associated with a carbon dioxide storage facility or
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
Class VI injection well regulated under this Chapter, including response to alarms,
releases, well integrity events, or other reportable occurrences requiring local public
safety action.
(5) Eligible recipients include parishes, municipalities, and other political
subdivisions, including fire protection districts, law enforcement agencies,
emergency medical service districts, emergency communications districts, and
offices of homeland security and emergency preparedness, located within either of
the following:
(a) A parish in which a storage facility or Class VI injection well regulated
under this Chapter is located.
(b) A parish that is within the area of review, has a nexus to, or is reasonably
determined by the secretary to be potentially impacted by the permitted activity.
(6) The authority shall establish by rule an application and review process
for eligible entities to submit requests, including minimum documentation
requirements, evaluation criteria, reporting requirements, and prioritization factors.
Prioritization may include proximity to permitted projects, population potentially
impacted, existing response capacity, and the nature and scale of permitted
operations.
(7) Any grant or reimbursement shall be conditioned on appropriate
documentation, record retention, and audit rights. Unused or improperly expended
amounts shall be subject to repayment to the account or subaccount, as applicable.
(8) The Natural Resources Trust Authority may use monies in the account
for administration of the program established by this Subsection; however, such
administrative costs shall not exceed five percent of the excess fees deposited into
the account in a fiscal year.
K. The protection of underground sources of drinking water, as mandated by
the Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974, is an essential component of the department's
responsibility for geologic storage. Stewardship in fulfilling these obligations
includes the following:
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1519 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1152
(1) No monies held in site-specific trust accounts pursuant to Subsection
(B)(6) of this Section shall be deposited into or disbursed from the account
established in Subsection J of this Section.
(2) No monies in the fund shall be transferred to the account established in
Subsection J of this Section.
(3) The secretary shall ensure that the collection and allocation of excess fees
does not impair the ability of the department to carry out the purposes of Paragraphs
(E)(1) through (7) of this Section, including long-term monitoring, remediation,
mechanical leak repair, and plugging and abandonment.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 30:1103 and to correct any
cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent with the provisions
of this Act.